California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
An abstract of the judgment, or a copy thereof, may be filed with the county recorder of any county. From the time of filing of the judgment, the amount of the judgment constitutes a lien upon all of the property in the county owned by the judgment debtor. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the judgment, unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien imposed by this section is not valid insofar as personal property is concerned against a purchaser for value without actual knowledge of the lien.

Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) The person named in a notice of deficiency determination or redetermination may, within 30 days of the notice of filing with the superior court, file an action for judicial review thereof, as provided in subdivision (c), in the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento or, with the director’s consent, the superior court of any other county where the Attorney General maintains an office. As a condition of staying entry of judgment or granting other relief, the court shall require the filing of a corporate surety bond with the director in the amount of the deficiency stated in the certificate. In any court proceeding, the certificate of the director determining the deficiency shall be prima facie evidence of the fee and the amount due and unpaid.

(e) The provisions of this section are supplemental to any other procedures for collection and imposition of fees and penalties provided by this chapter.

In lieu of proceeding pursuant to this section, the director may file a complaint for collection of unpaid assessments as provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

59235.

In addition to such civil penalty, any person that knowingly exceeds any quota or allotment or marketable percentage fixed for him under any marketing order, regulation, or rule and regulation, issued by the director pursuant to such marketing order, shall forfeit to this state a sum equal to the current market value of such excess (or three times such amount, in the discretion of the court) which forfeiture may be recoverable in a civil suit which is brought in the name of this state. Any money which is recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in accordance with Section 58937.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59236.

If the use by a producer or handler of a particular emblem, label, certificate, or other distinctive designation of grade, quality, or condition, except the grade or other quality designations then in effect pursuant to state or federal grade standards, is made contingent upon compliance with certain production or handling regulations which are authorized by the provisions of a marketing order or agreement which is issued and made effective pursuant to this chapter, it is unlawful and a violation of this chapter for any person, that is not participating in, and complying with, such order, agreement, or regulations to use such designation of grade, quality, or condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967.   Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59237.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person to willfully render or furnish a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record which is required by the director pursuant to any provision of this chapter, or any marketing order which is effective pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59238.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person that is engaged in the handling or processing of any commodity, or in the wholesale or retail trade of the commodity, to fail or refuse to furnish to the director or his duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he has received any commodity which is regulated by a marketing order that is issued and in effect pursuant to this chapter, and the quantity of such commodity which is so received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59239.

It is a violation of this chapter for any handler to receive, handle, or have in his possession any commodity which is regulated by a marketing order or marketing agreement which is issued pursuant to this chapter, that the handler knows is being marketed by the producer of the commodity without complying with, or in violation of any provision of such marketing order or agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59240.

The director on his own motion may, or shall upon complaint of any interested party which charges any violation of any provision of this chapter or any provision of any marketing order, regulation, or rule and regulation, which is issued by the director and effective pursuant to this chapter, do one of the following:

(a) Refer the matter directly to the Attorney General or any district attorney for the institution of legal proceedings upon the matter.

(b) If he deems it necessary or advisable, immediately call an administrative hearing to consider the charges which are set forth in such verified complaint.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59241.

If the matter is referred directly by the director to the Attorney General or any district attorney, such officer shall thereupon bring an appropriate action in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state, if, after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes that a violation has occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59242.

If an administrative hearing is called by the director, the director shall cause a copy of such complaint, together with a notice of the time and place of hearing of such complaint, to be served personally or by mail upon every person that is named as a respondent in such verified complaint. Such service shall be made at least 10 days before the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59243.

The hearing shall be held at one of the following places which is selected by the director:

(a) The city or place in which the principal place of business of the respondent is situated.

(b) The city or place in which the violation complained of is alleged to have occurred.

(c) In the nearest office of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59244.

At the time and place which is designated for such administrative hearing, the director shall hear the parties to the complaint and shall enter in his office at Sacramento, his findings which are based upon the facts that are established at such hearing. If from the testimony and evidence which is adduced at the administrative hearing the director finds that no violation has occurred, he shall forthwith dismiss such complaint and notify the parties to such complaint.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59245.

If the director finds from the administrative hearing that a violation has occurred, he shall so enter his findings and notify the parties to such complaint. The director may refer the matter to the Attorney General for the institution of legal proceedings or he may notify such parties to cease and desist from further violation.

Upon their refusal or failure to comply, or if he finds that the facts or circumstances warrant immediate prosecution, he shall file a complaint with the Attorney General or any district attorney which requests that such officer commence any action which is authorized in this chapter against such respondent in a court of competent jurisdiction as set forth in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59246.

The Attorney General, or any district attorney, shall upon complaint by the director or any other person, or may, upon his own initiative, if, after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action for criminal penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this chapter or any marketing order which is duly issued by the director and effective pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59247.

The Attorney General shall upon complaint by the director or may, upon his own initiative, if, after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation to have occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court of this state for civil penalties or for injunctive relief, including specific performance of any obligation which is imposed by any marketing order, regulation, or rule and regulation, which is issued pursuant to this chapter, against any person violating any provision of this chapter or of any marketing order, regulation, or rule and regulation, which is duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59248.

If it appears to the court upon any application for a temporary restraining order, or upon the hearing of any order to show cause why a preliminary injunction should not be issued, or upon the hearing of any motion for a preliminary injunction, or if the court shall find, in any such action, that any defendant is violating, or has violated, any provision of this chapter, any marketing order, or any regulation, or rule and regulation, duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter, the court shall enjoin the defendant from committing further violations, and may compel specific performance of any obligation imposed by a marketing order, or any regulation which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59249.

In any suit brought by the Attorney General to enforce any provision of this chapter, any marketing order which is issued by the director and effective pursuant to this chapter, or any regulation, or rule and regulation, which is issued by the director pursuant to the provisions of any marketing order, the judgment, if in favor of the state, shall provide that the defendant pay to the director the costs which were incurred by the director and by the advisory board concerned with the administration of such marketing order in the prosecution of such action. Any money which is recovered shall be deposited in accordance with Section 58937.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59250.

Any such action may be commenced either in the county where defendant resides, or where any act or omission, or part of the act or omission, which is complained of occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59251.

The penalties and remedies which are prescribed in this article with respect to any violation mentioned in this article are concurrent and alternative, and neither singly nor combined are exclusive, and either singly or combined are cumulative with any and all other civil, criminal, or administrative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties which are provided or allowed by law with respect to any such violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59252.

In lieu of other procedures which are provided in this article, the director may, if he finds that any person has exceeded any quota, allotment, or marketable percentage which is fixed for him pursuant to any marketing order issued by the director pursuant to this chapter, and if the director further finds that such person did not intend to violate such quota, allotment, or marketable percentage, make demand on such person to pay to the director an amount equal to the market value of the quantity marketed in excess of such quota, allotment, or percentage.

Such market value shall be only the cost of acquisition to the person that is concerned and does not include the value of services or commodities which are added subsequent to acquisition. Payment of such amount shall preclude any further enforcement action in connection with such transaction. If such person refuses to pay, or fails to pay, the amount which is demanded, the director shall thereupon proceed in accordance with the other provisions of this article. Any money which is recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in accordance with Section 58937.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Inspection and Abatement [59281. - 59293.]

59281.

This article applies to any lot of any commodity which is regulated by a marketing order or marketing agreement wherever, or in whose possession, such lot may be in the marketing channels within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59282.

Any authorized inspector, or other authorized person, who is discharging his duties in the checking of compliance with the provisions of any marketing order which is made effective pursuant to this chapter may enter and inspect any premises, enclosure, building, or conveyance where he has reason to believe any commodity which is subject to a marketing order is produced, stored, being prepared for market, or marketed, and inspect, or cause to be inspected, such representative samples of the commodity as may be necessary to determine whether or not any lot of such commodity is in compliance with applicable regulations, or rules and regulations, of any marketing order which is made effective pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59283.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any authorized inspector, or other authorized person, in the discharge of his duties, if he has reason to believe that a lot of any commodity subject to a marketing order or marketing agreement which is issued pursuant to this chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of such marketing order or agreement, or of marketing regulations, or rules and regulations, which are issued pursuant to it, as to quality, condition, size, maturity, pack, labeling, or markings, may hold such lot for a reasonable period of time sufficient to enable such officer to ascertain by an authorized inspection whether such lot complies with such marketing requirements, but in any event not to exceed 24 hours in the case of perishables, or 72 hours in the case of nonperishables.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59284.

Following inspection, such inspector or other authorized person may affix to any lot which is determined to be in noncompliance, an official notice, warning tag, or other appropriate marking which warns that the lot is held and states the reasons why it is held. It is unlawful for any person, except an authorized inspector or enforcing officer, to detach, alter, deface, or destroy any such official notice, warning tag, or marking so affixed to any such lot, or to remove or dispose of such lot in any manner or under conditions other than as prescribed in such notice of noncompliance except upon written permission of an authorized enforcing officer or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59285.

The director, or the authorized person by whom such lot is being held, shall serve the person in possession of the lot with a notice of noncompliance. Such notice shall be served in person or by mail to the last known address of such person that is in possession. The person in possession shall notify the owner of the lot, or every other person that has an interest in it, of the serving of such notice of noncompliance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59286.

The notice of noncompliance shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the lot.

(b) The place where, and the reasons for which, the lot is held.

(c) A citation of the applicable marketing order or agreement or marketing regulation, or rule and regulation, and any section of it upon which the notice of noncompliance is based.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59287.

The owner of the lot shall have, in the case of a perishable commodity not to exceed 48 hours, and in the case of a nonperishable commodity not to exceed 72 hours, from the time of serving such notice of noncompliance for reconditioning or for the correction of the deficiencies which are noted in the notice of noncompliance. If such lot is reconditioned or the deficiencies are corrected the enforcing officer shall remove the warning tags or markings and release the lot for marketing or may, with the consent of the owner of such lot, divert the lot to other lawful uses or destroy it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59288.

If the owner of the lot fails or refuses to give such consent, or if the lot has not been reconditioned or the deficiencies otherwise corrected so as to bring it into compliance within the time which is specified in the notice, the enforcing officer shall proceed as provided in Section 59289.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59289.

(a) The enforcing officer may file a verified petition in superior court requesting permission to divert the lot to any other available lawful use or to destroy the lot. The verified petition shall show all of the following:

(1) The condition of the lot.

(2) That the lot is situated within the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the petition is being filed.

(3) That the lot is held, and that the notice of noncompliance has been served as provided in Section 59285.

(4) That the lot has not been reconditioned as required.

(5) The name and address of the owner and the person in possession of the lot.

(6) That the owner has refused permission to divert or to destroy the lot.

(b) A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

59290.

Upon the filing of the verified petition, the court may issue an order to show cause returnable in five days after service upon the owner why the lot shall not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected, or why the lot shall not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed.

The owner of the lot may, prior to the date when the order to show cause is returnable, either recondition or correct the deficiencies in the lot so as to bring it into compliance, or may file at or before the hearing on the order an answer with the court stating why the lot should not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected so as to bring it into compliance, or showing why it should not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59291.

If at the expiration of the five-day period the owner of the lot has failed or refused to recondition or to correct the deficiencies so as to bring the lot into compliance, the court may enter judgment ordering that the lot be reconditioned, diverted to any other lawful use, destroyed in the manner which is directed by the court, relabeled, denatured or otherwise processed, sold, or released upon such conditions as the court in its discretion may impose. The lot may not, however, be sold or released into the regular channels of trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59292.

In the event of sale of any lot by order of court, the costs of storage, handling, and reconditioning or disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance, if any, paid into court for the account of the owner of any such lot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59293.

Disposal of any lot or portion of any lot pursuant to the provisions of this article, whether such disposal be by arrangement with an enforcement officer or by court order, does not waive any of the penalty provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Agricultural Producers Marketing Law [59501. - 60016.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [59501. - 59514.]

59501.

This chapter shall be known as the Agricultural Producers Marketing Law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59504.

“Commodity” means any horticultural, viticultural, or vegetable product of the soil, aquacultural, livestock and livestock products, and poultry and poultry products. It does not, however, include milk or milk products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

59505.

“Dealer” means any distributor or retailer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59506.

“Distributor” means any person, except a retailer, that acquires and distributes any commodity at wholesale or retail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59507.

“Handler” means any person that receives any commodity from the producer for the purpose of marketing it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59508.

“Marketing program” means any program which contains provisions which are authorized by Article 8 (commencing with Section 59801) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59509.

“Primary channel of trade” means that transaction in which the producer or a cooperative marketing association of producers transfers physical possession of the commodity to another person in the current of commercial trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59510.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of growing or producing any commodity for commercial use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59511.

“Processor” means any person that buys, or otherwise takes title to or possession of, any commodity for the purpose of processing or manufacturing it or selling, reselling, or redelivering it in dried, canned, extracted, fermented, distilled, or other preserved form. It also includes all of the following:

(a) Any person or exchange that conducts such business.

(b) Any person or exchange that buys any commodity from the producer of the commodity for the purpose of reselling it to any person or exchange that conducts such business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59512.

“Proration” means the application of allocated quantities or percentages under a uniform rule to the production, or merchantable production, of all producers that are affected, for the purpose of regulating the quantity of any commodity which may be harvested, prepared for market, or marketed in primary channels of trade during any specified period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59513.

“Proration zone” means any district for which a marketing program is proposed or has been instituted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59514.

“Retailer” means any person that is engaged in the business of making retail sales direct to the general public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [59541. - 59546.]

59541.

The Legislature declares that: The disorderly marketing of commodities in this state; the improper preparation for market; the lack of uniform grade specifications or uniform inspection of commodities; the marketing of commodities in excess of reasonable or normal market demands therefor; or the inability of individual producers to expand existing markets or to develop new or larger markets for California grown commodities tends to prevent agricultural producers from maintaining a proper standard of living or from contributing their fair share to the support of necessary governmental and educational functions and thereby tends to increase unfairly the tax burden of other citizens of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59542.

The conditions set forth in Section 59541 vitally concern the health, peace, safety and general welfare of the people of this state. It is declared to be the policy of this state to aid agricultural producers in preventing or correcting adverse marketing conditions, improving existing marketing conditions, expanding existing markets, promoting new or broader markets, developing more orderly or efficient or equitable methods in the marketing of commodities and thereby to aid agricultural producers to achieve and maintain a purchasing power at an equitable and reasonable level.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59543.

The production and marketing of commodities by producers within this state is declared to be affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Enacted By Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59545.

Any order of the director which makes effective a marketing program, and any other order of the director which substantially affects the rights of any interested party, may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction. Any such action shall be commenced withn 30 days after the effective date of the order which is complained of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59546.

If producers of any commodity which is regulated by a marketing program that is issued by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter are required to comply with minimum quality, condition, size, or maturity regulations, no person may, except as otherwise provided in such program, process, distribute, or otherwise handle any of such commodity from any source, whether produced within or without this state, which commodity does not meet such minimum requirements which are applicable to producers of the commodity in this state.

Such regulations do not, however, apply to any commodity which has been produced outside of this state and is in transit on the effective date of the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [59571. - 59572.]

59571.

By reason of the climatic and other conditions which relate to the production and marketing of figs for canning purposes, no marketing program pursuant to this chapter shall be established for figs for canning purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59572.

By reason of the climatic conditions and other factors which relate to the production of grapes in such counties, no marketing program shall be applicable to grapes in Sonoma, Napa, Mendocino, Lake, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Alameda, San Benito, Solano, San Luis Obispo, Contra Costa, Monterey, and Marin Counties, or any of them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [59607. - 59619.]

59607.

The director may appoint an attorney and shall provide for such other personnel as may be necessary and shall prescribe their duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59611.

The director may conduct hearings and investigations to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59612.

In the conduct of any hearing, inquiry, or investigation, the director may administer oaths, and issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, maps, accounts, documents, and testimony in any inquiry, investigation, or hearing which is ordered or undertaken in any part of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59614.

The superior court of the county in which any inquiry, investigation, or hearing is held may compel the attendance of witnesses and require the disclosure by the witnesses of all facts known to them, relative to the matters under investigation, and the production of papers, maps, books, accounts, documents, and testimony as required by any subpoenas issued by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59615.

Any party that disobeys any order or subpoena which is issued pursuant to the authority of the director is guilty of contempt and shall be certified to the superior court of the county in which the contempt occurs, which court shall punish the contempt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59616.

The director through his duly authorized representatives and agents, including any proration zone agent who is in charge of a marketing program, shall have access, solely for the purposes of investigating possible violations of any marketing program, to the records of every producer, dealer, distributor, public or private property transporatation agency, and handler of a commodity as to which a marketing program has been instituted. He shall have at all times free and unimpeded access to any building, yard, warehouse, store, or transportation facility or other place in which any commodity under a marketing program is kept, stored, handled, or transported. All information which is obtained is confidential and shall not be disclosed unless required in a judicial proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59617.

In carrying out his duties under this chapter, the director may utilize the facilities and personnel of the state and county departments of agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59618.

A full and accurate record of business or acts which are performed, or of testimony which is taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be kept and be placed on file in the office of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

59619.

The director may purchase general liability insurance for all marketing programs subject to the provisions of this chapter in an amount he or she determines as necessary. The cost of the insurance shall be paid by the affected marketing programs on a pro rata basis. The insurance policy shall name the director, in his or her official capacity, and all persons, collectively, that are subject to the marketing program as insured parties for claims made against the marketing program in its advisory capacity to the director or against the director regarding the activities of the marketing program. The director, after consultation with the Attorney General, may refer claims to the insurance carrier for appropriate action. In the alternative, the director may require that claims be handled in the manner otherwise specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of Proration Zone [59641. - 59662.]

59641.

Ten or more producers of the variety or kind of commodity which is to be affected may file with the director a petition for the establishment of a proration zone and the institution of a marketing program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59642.

The petition shall, among other things, contain or be accompanied by all of the following:

(a) A description of the district which comprises the proration zone upon which the proposed marketing program is to be based.

(b) A general statement of facts which sets forth the necessity for instituting a marketing program.

(c) A draft of a proposed marketing program, or a statement of the principal features which are to be included in the proposed marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59643.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 59654, if, after receiving a petition for the establishment of a proration zone and a proposed marketing program for it, the director determines that such proposed proration zone and proposed marketing program are consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the director shall hold a public hearing at some central point which is located within the area described in the petition and proposed to be established as a proration zone.

If the director determines that the proposed proration zone or proposed marketing program is not consistent with the provisions of this chapter, no hearing need be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59645.

Prior to holding a public hearing upon a proposed proration zone and a proposed marketing program, the director:

(a) May require the petitioners to file with the department a good and sufficient undertaking to cover the probable cost of conducting the hearing and instituting a marketing program.

(b) Shall establish a list of producers of the commodity which is affected within the area which comprises the proposed proration zone.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59646.

In establishing the list of producers, the director may issue a notice to handlers which requires them to file with the director a certified report that shows all of the following:

(a) The name and mailing address of the handler.

(b) The quantities of the commodity that is to be affected, which were handled by the handler in the marketing season next preceding the filing of the report, together with a reasonable determination of the quantity so handled which was produced within the proposed boundaries of the proration zone.

(c) The correct name and mailing address of each producer, whose producing operations are located within the proposed proration zone, from whom the handler received the commodity which is to be affected, during the next preceding season. 

(d) The quantities of the commodity which were received by the handler from each such producer in the marketing season next preceding the filing of the report.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59647.

The notice to handlers which requires them to file the lists shall be published by the director pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in the capital of the state and in such other localities as the director may require, and shall be mailed to all handlers of the commodity that are directly affected, of record with the department. The lists of producers shall be filed by handlers within 10 days from the last date of publication of the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59648.

In addition, the director may obtain lists of producers that are affected, whenever and in such manner as he may deem necessary or advisable for the purpose of checking, comparing, or correcting such lists. The director shall maintain a current list of producers which is based upon the records of operations under each marketing program. Such producer list shall, subject to any proper corrections, be final and conclusive in making determinations relative to the assent by producers upon a marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59649.

Any producer that produces the commodity which is affected by any proposed or existing marketing program, whose name does not appear upon the director’s list of producers affected, may have his name established upon such list by filing with the director a signed statement which states that he produced such commodity in the next preceding season and gives the quantity which was produced and the quantity which was delivered into primary channels of trade in such season.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59650.

Notice of the public hearing shall be mailed to a list of producers within the proposed zone at least 10 days prior to such hearing. The list of producers shall be established in accordance with the provisions of Sections 59646, 59647, 59648, and 59649. A notice of such public hearing shall also be given at least 10 days prior to such hearing by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the area proposed as the proration zone. If the proposed proration zone includes areas that are noncontiguous, the director shall hold a hearing in each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59651.

At the public hearing, the director shall receive evidence offered by the petitioners in support of the proposed proration zone and the proposed marketing program and evidence from any interested person in support of, or in opposition to, them. All testimony at the hearings shall be under oath.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59652.

The hearings may be adjourned from time to time and from place to place as the circumstances may require. For the purpose of procuring additional evidence, facts, and data, petitioners or opponents shall, upon proper motion, be granted a continuation of any hearing by the director for a period not exceeding five days. A transcript of the proceedings at all such hearings shall be made by the director and shall be open to inspection by any interested party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59653.
